Rhode Island statutes. Title 47 Weights and Measures
Chapter 8 Gasoline and Petroleum Products

47-8-1.
Testing of measuring devices — Forbidding use — Fee.

The director of the department of labor and training is hereby authorized and directed to have tested all gasoline measuring devices used in the sale of gasoline, from time to time, as in his or her judgment it may be deemed necessary, to prevent fraud or deception in the use of these devices or to ensure the accurate measurement of gasoline in the sale.

Any town or city sealer of weights, measures, and balances shall have authority to condemn and forbid the use of any gasoline measuring device for the sale of gasoline in his or her respective town or city, or until the device has been duly tried and sealed, or until the gasoline measuring device has been equipped with such an attachment, contrivance, or apparatus as will ensure the correct and proper functioning of the measuring device for the sale of the gasoline by accurate measurement.

The sealer of weights and measures in any town or city shall receive the same fee as any state sealer, approved by the state, as stated in §

47-1-5.1

, except in the city of Providence where the sealer shall have the authority to remove and replace any lead seal on any gasoline measuring device and to charge an additional fee of five dollars ($5.00) for that service.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 28; P.L. 1922, ch. 2185, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 25; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-8-1

; P.L. 1970, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 252, § 2; P.L. 1984, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 12; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 67; P.L. 2018, ch. 211, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 272, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 308, art. 2, § 15.

47-8-2.
Sealed measure to be used on demand of purchaser.

Any person, firm, or corporation selling or vending gasoline from a gasoline station, so-called, or from a garage, shall keep for use at the gasoline station or garage a five (5) gallon measure which has been properly tested and sealed by the sealer of weights, measures, and balances of the town or city in which the gasoline station or garage is located. Upon the request of any purchaser of gasoline, the person selling the gasoline shall, in the presence of the purchaser, use the gasoline measure in the sale of the gasoline.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 29; P.L. 1922, ch. 2185, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 26; G.L. 1956, §

47-8-2

.

47-8-3.
Use of sealed measure after seal on measuring device broken.

Whenever it becomes necessary in the repairing of any gasoline measuring device to break the seal of the gasoline measuring device, it shall be the duty of every person, firm, or corporation selling or vending gasoline at a gasoline station or garage to use a five (5) gallon measure which has been properly tested and sealed, until such time as the gasoline measuring device shall have been repaired and properly tested and sealed by the sealer of weights, measures, and balances of the town or city in which the gasoline station or garage is located.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 30; P.L. 1922, ch. 2185, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 27; G.L. 1956, §

47-8-3

.

47-8-4.
Standard measure furnished to towns by director of the department of labor and training.

The director of the department of labor and training shall furnish to the sealer of weights, measures, and balances of each town and city one five (5) gallon liquid measure, to be paid for by the respective town or city. Each measure before being used for the purpose described in §§

47-8-2

—

47-8-4

shall be tested and sealed by the director of labor and training to have a capacity of five (5) gallons liquid measure according to the United States standard. The measure after being so tested and sealed shall be used exclusively for the purpose of testing and sealing all measuring devices used in the sale of gasoline.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 31; P.L. 1922, ch. 2185, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 28; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-8-4

.

47-8-5.
Testing and marking of tank vehicles and meters.

The capacity of every tank vehicle used and each compartment thereof used for the transportation over the public highways of this state of fuels, such as gasoline and other volatile and inflammable liquids including oils used for heating purposes, when used as a measuring device shall be tested and sealed at least once every three (3) years by the director of labor and training. The capacity, when so determined, shall be plainly printed upon the right hand side of the vehicle tank dome in letters and numerals not less than one inch in height. The meters of the vehicle tanks and the meters of home delivery truck vehicles and loading rack meters shall be tested and sealed at least once a year by the director of labor and training.

The director of the department of labor and training shall assess a fee of one and eight tenths cent (1.8¢) per gallon for measuring tank vehicles, and a fee of nine dollars and sixty cents ($9.60) for testing meters on tank vehicles, and home delivery truck vehicles, except, when those meters are gravity fed, the fee shall be eighteen dollars ($18.00), and a fee of eighteen dollars ($18.00) shall be assessed for testing loading rack meters at least once every year, and a fee of twenty-four dollars ($24.00) shall be assessed for testing and sealing of bottom loading rack meters at least once every year.

The director of the department of labor and training shall also receive reasonable compensation for all adjustments which it may be necessary for the director to make. Reasonable compensation shall not exceed the rates as provided herein.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 221, § 33; P.L. 1938, ch. 2625, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 29; impl. am. P.L. 1941, ch. 1069, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

47-8-5

; P.L. 1960, ch. 74, § 25; P.L. 1980, ch. 224, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 39, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 12; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 67.

47-8-6.
Use of unsealed or condemned measuring device.

Every person who shall use or cause to be used any gasoline measuring device without first having the device tested and sealed by the town or city sealer of weights, measures, and balances wherein the gasoline measuring device is located, and every person who shall use or cause to be used any gasoline measuring device after the device has been condemned by any town or city sealer of weights, measures, and balances, and before the device has been again tested and sealed, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 194, § 32; P.L. 1922, ch. 2185, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 221, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 407, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

47-8-6

.

47-8-7.
Liability insurance — Marking of vehicles.

The owner of land or facilities used to store petroleum products or who owns or leases vehicles used to transport petroleum products for purposes of resale shall maintain a liability insurance policy which includes pollution liability broad form coverage of no less than two million dollars ($2,000,000). The insurance policy shall be comprehensive in nature and include coverage for underground or aboveground contamination due to leakage from any kind of a petroleum product stored on the land or facility or which may be discharged from a vehicle transporting the petroleum product for purposes of resale. The provisions of this section shall apply to owners of facilities that are engaged in the business of selling petroleum products at wholesale or retail, and shall not apply to leasing companies engaged in the business of leasing or renting vehicles used to transport petroleum products.

Any petroleum delivery vehicle carrying petroleum products must have certification, on Rhode Island form GU-1338A or Rhode Island form DMU-1, of a two million dollar ($2,000,000) liability insurance policy which includes pollution liability broad form coverage prior to registration of the vehicle in the state of Rhode Island. Proof of certification of the insurance must be on file with wholesale suppliers and/or petroleum distributor terminals for vehicles to obtain petroleum products in Rhode Island for marketing. A state of Rhode Island resale certificate number must also be on file with the supplier and distributing terminal. The provisions of this section relating to liability insurance do not apply in those cases where an owner certifies that he or she is self insured, to at least the required amount, and provides certification of the self insurance.

Any petroleum delivery vehicle carrying petroleum products must comply with section 397.21 of the federal Motor Carriers Safety Regulations for the Transportation of Hazardous Materials, entitled “Marking of Vehicles Operated by Private Carriers”, prior to registration of the vehicle, and maintain the registration of the vehicle by the motor vehicle division of the department of administration of the state of Rhode Island. The marking shall include the following:

Placarding in accordance with federal requirements.

The name of the enterprise, and the city or town in which the enterprise maintains its principal office or in which the vehicle or vehicles are customarily based.

The markings must appear on both sides of the vehicle, be in letters that contrast sharply in color with the background, be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of fifty feet (50´) while the vehicle is stationary, and be kept and maintained in a manner that retains the legibility required. The marking may consist of a removable device if that device meets the identification and legibility requirements of this subsection, for a period not to exceed three (3) months after registration of said vehicle.

The director of the department of administration is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and regulations for the enforcement and administration of the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 266, § 4; P.L. 1984, ch. 288, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 119; P.L. 1992, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 67.

47-8-8.
Licensing of petroleum products delivery companies.

There shall be an annual license fee of one hundred twenty dollars ($120) for each enterprise name used or involved in the delivery of petroleum products and a reapplication fee of six hundred dollars ($600) for each enterprise required to renew who fail to do so after the licensing date of August 1. All monies received under this section shall be deposited as general revenue. The application for a license to be issued and administered by the weights and measures division of the department of labor and training shall include:

Certification of two million dollars ($2,000,000) liability insurance which includes pollution liability broad form coverage or certification of self insurance.

Number of registered and unregistered delivery vehicles (including color, type of vehicle, and year and make of vehicle).

Statement that petroleum delivery vehicle identifications are in accordance with § 397 of federal Motor Carriers Safety Regulations for the Transportation of Hazardous Materials, including § 397.21, entitled “Marking of Vehicles Operated by Private Carriers” including:

Placarding in accordance with federal requirements.

The name of the enterprise to whom the petroleum company license is issued, and the city or town in which the enterprise maintains its principal office or in which the vehicle or vehicles are customarily based.

The markings specified in subsection (a)(1)(iii) must appear on both sides of the vehicle, and be in letters that contrast sharply in color with the background; and be readily legible during daylight hours from a distance of fifty feet (50´) while the vehicle is stationary; and be kept and maintained in a manner that retains the legibility required. The marking may consist of a removable device, if that device meets the identification and legibility requirements of this paragraph, for a period not to exceed three (3) months after the registration of said vehicle.

All meters of the vehicles listed on the application must be tested and sealed before the meters shall be used in any delivery of petroleum products. The meters shall be tolerance tested for compliance with the current year National Institute of Standards and Technology Handbook #44. Meters not in tolerance compliance shall be so marked in accordance with §

47-3-1

and subject to the fines as stated.

An enterprise so licensed shall be required to provide the wholesale petroleum terminals with proof of the fact that it is licensed prior to obtaining any petroleum products.

An enterprise so licensed shall be required to use:

Said license number; and

Enterprise name when advertising or offering for sale home heating fuels.

The director of the department of labor and training is authorized and empowered to promulgate rules and regulations for the enforcement and administration of the provisions of this chapter.

The rules and regulations shall be promulgated as required to enforce this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 266, § 4; P.L. 1984, ch. 421, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 386, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 33, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 163; P.L. 1999, ch. 426, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 13, § 12.

47-8-9.
Definitions.

Wherever in this chapter, unless otherwise defined, the words
“fuel oil”
or

“petroleum products”

are used, they shall be construed to be home heating fuels.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 266, § 4.